Arkansas, session 2025, HB1576.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 8-6-203, concerning definitions within the
Arkansas Solid Waste Management Act, is amended to add an additional
subdivision to read as follows:
(23) "Karst typography" means an area with dissolution of
soluble carbonate rocks such as limestone and dolomite where the water system
is a network of interconnected fissures, fractures, and conduits emplaced in
a relatively low-permeability rock matrix.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 8-6-205(a), concerning illegal actions
under the Arkansas Solid Waste Management Act, is amended to read as follows:
(a) It shall be illegal for any person:
(1) To violate any provision of this subchapter or any rule or
order of the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission issued
pursuant to this subchapter or of a permit issued under this subchapter by
the Division of Environmental Quality;
(2) To construct, install, alter, modify, use, or operate any
solid waste processing or disposal facility or disposal site without a permit
*JMB361*
03-05-2025 10:54:24 JMB361

As Engrossed: H2/27/25 H3/3/25 H3/5/25 HB1576
from the division;
(3)(A) To construct, install, modify, use, or operate a solid
waste landfill that is not existing on the effective date of this subdivision
(a)(3)(A) of this section in the outcrop area of geologic formations,
including karst topography.
(B) Subdivision (a)(3)(A) of this section does not apply
to a transfer station, recycling facility, composting facility, or other
waste disposal method that is not a solid waste landfill;
(4) To dispose of solid wastes at any disposal site or facility
other than a disposal site or facility for which a permit has been issued by
the division. However, no provision of this subchapter shall be construed so
as to prevent an individual from disposing of solid wastes resulting from his
or her own household activities on his or her own land if the disposal does
not create a public or private nuisance or a hazard to health and does not
violate a city ordinance or other law and does not involve the open dumping
of garbage;
(4)(5) To dump, deposit, throw, or in any manner leave or
abandon any solid wastes, including, but not limited to, garbage, tin cans,
bottles, rubbish, refuse, or trash upon property owned by another person
without the written permission of the owner or occupant of the property or
upon any public highway, street, road, public park or recreation area, or any
other public property except as designated for disposal of waste; or
(5)(6) To sort, collect, transport, process, or dispose of solid
waste contrary to the rules or orders of the division or in such a manner or
place as to create or be likely to create a public nuisance or a public
health hazard or to cause or be likely to cause water or air pollution within
the meaning of the Arkansas Water and Air Pollution Control Act, § 8-4-101 et
seq.

/s/Lundstrum






03-05-2025 10:54:24 JMB361